Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.170

Ascertainment of liens—Priority.

If it appear by such certificate or reference, in case the certificate is not produced, that any such liens exist, the court shall appoint a referee to ascertain what amount remains due thereon or secured thereby respectively, and the order of priority in which they are entitled to be paid out of the property.

[Code 1881 s 568; 1877 p 119 s 571; 1869 p 136 s 521; RRS s 854.]